Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.040

Rules subject to administrative procedure act.

All rules adopted under the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW as enacted or hereafter amended, concerning the adoption of rules.

[ 1989 c 380 s 35; 1961 c 249 s 4.]